North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 7. Organization.
District 12B: Cumberland County: VTD: CC01, VTD: CC03, VTD: CC05, VTD: CC13: Block(s) 0510008001000, 0510008001002, 0510008001003, 0510008001004, 0510008001018, 0510008001019, 0510010001001, 0510010001002, 0510010001003, 0510010001004, 0510010001005, 0510010001006, 0510010001007, 0510010002000, 0510010002001, 0510010002002, 0510010002003, 0510010002010, 0510010002014, 0510010002015, 0510010002016, 0510010002017, 0510010002018, 0510010002019, 0510010002020, 0510010002021, 0510010002022, 0510010002023, 0510010002024, 0510010002025, 0510010002026, 0510010002027, 0510010002028, 0510010002029, 0510010002030, 0510010002031, 0510010002032, 0510010002033, 0510010002034, 0510011003017, 0510011003018, 0510011003019, 0510011003020, 0510011003021, 0510011003022, 0510011003023, 0510011003024, 0510011003025, 0510011003026; VTD: CC15: 0510006003000, 0510006003001, 0510006003002, 0510006003003, 0510006003004, 0510006003005, 0510006003006, 0510006003007, 0510006003008, 0510006003013, 0510006005000, 0510006005001, 0510006005002, 0510006005003, 0510006005004, 0510006005005, 0510006005006, 0510006005007, 0510006005008, 0510006005009, 0510006005010, 0510006005011, 0510006005012, 0510006005013, 0510006005014, 0510006005015, 0510006005016, 0510006005018, 0510006005019, 0510006005020, 0510006005021, 0510006005022, 0510006005023, 0510038003033, 0510038003034, 0510038003060, 0510038003061; VTD: CC16, VTD: CC17, VTD: CC19, VTD: CL57, VTD: G11: Block(s) 0510025041000, 0510033132008; 0510034011000, 0510034011001, 0510034011002, 0510034011003, 0510034011004, 0510034011005, 0510034011006, 0510034011007, 0510034011008, 0510034011009, 0510034011010, 0510034011011, 0510034011012, 0510034011013, 0510034011014, 0510034011015, 0510034011016, 0510034011017, 0510034011018, 0510034011019, 0510034011020, 0510034011021, 0510034011022, 0510034011023, 0510034011024, 0510034011025, 0510034011026, 0510034011027, 0510034011028, 0510034011029, 0510034011030, 0510034011031, 0510034011032, 0510034011033, 0510034011034, 0510034011035, 0510034011036, 0510034011037, 0510034011038, 0510034011039, 0510034011040, 0510034011041, 0510034011042, 0510034011043, 0510034012000, 0510034012001, 0510034012002, 0510034012003, 0510034012004, 0510034012005, 0510034012006, 0510034012007, 0510034012008, 0510034012009, 0510034012010, 0510034012011, 0510034012012, 0510034012013, 0510034012014, 0510034012015, 0510034012016, 0510034012017, 0510034012018, 0510034012019, 0510034012020, 0510034012021, 0510034012022, 0510034012023, 0510034012024, 0510034012025, 0510034012026, 0510034012027, 0510034012028, 0510034012029, 0510034012030, 0510034012031, 0510034012032, 0510034012033, 0510034012034, 0510034012035, 0510034012036, 0510034012037, 0510034012038, 0510034012039, 0510034012040, 0510034012041, 0510034012042, 0510034012043, 0510034012044, 0510034012045, 0510034012046, 0510034012047, 0510034012048, 0510034012049, 0510034012050, 0510034012051, 0510034012052, 0510034012053, 0510034012054, 0510034012055, 0510034012056, 0510034012057, 0510034012058, 0510034012059, 0510034012060, 0510034012061, 0510034012062, 0510034012063, 0510034012064, 0510034012065, 0510034012066, 0510034012067, 0510034012068, 0510034012069, 0510034021000, 0510034021001, 0510034021002, 0510034021003, 0510034021004, 0510034021005, 0510034021006, 0510034021007, 0510034021008, 0510034021009, 0510034021010, 0510034021011, 0510034021012, 0510034021013, 0510034021014, 0510034021015, 0510034021016, 0510034021017, 0510034021018, 0510034021019, 0510034021020, 0510034021021, 0510034021022, 0510034021023, 0510034021024, 0510034021025, 0510034021026, 0510034021027, 0510034021028, 0510034021029, 0510034021030, 0510034021031, 0510034022000, 0510034022001, 0510034022002, 0510034022003, 0510034031000, 0510034031001, 0510034031002, 0510034031003, 0510034031004, 0510034031005, 0510034031006, 0510034031007, 0510034031008, 0510034031009, 0510034031010, 0510034031011, 0510034031012, 0510034031013, 0510034032000, 0510034032001, 0510034032002, 0510034032003, 0510034032004, 0510034032005, 0510034032006, 0510034032007, 0510034032008, 0510034032009, 0510034032010, 0510034032011, 0510034032012, 0510034032013, 0510034032014, 0510034032015, 0510034041000, 0510034041001, 0510034041002, 0510034041003, 0510034041004, 0510034041005, 0510034041006, 0510034041007, 0510034041008, 0510034041009, 0510034042000, 0510034042001, 0510034042002, 0510034042003, 0510034042004, 0510034042005, 0510034042006, 0510034042007, 0510034042008, 0510034042009, 0510034042010, 0510034042011, 0510034042012, 0510034042013, 0510034042014, 0510034042015, 0510034042016, 0510034042017, 0510034042018, 0510034042019, 0510034051000, 0510034051001, 0510034051002, 0510034051003, 0510034051004, 0510034051005, 0510034051006, 0510034051007, 0510034051008, 0510034051009, 0510034051010, 0510034051011, 0510034051012, 0510034051013, 0510034051014, 0510034051015, 0510034051016, 0510034051017, 0510034051018, 0510034051019, 0510034051020, 0510034051021, 0510034051022, 0510034051023, 0510034051024, 0510034051025, 0510034051026, 0510034051027, 0510034051028, 0510034051029, 0510034051030, 0510034051031, 0510034051032, 0510034061000, 0510034061001, 0510034061002, 0510034061003, 0510034061004, 0510034061005, 0510034061006, 0510034061007, 0510034061008, 0510034061009, 0510034061010, 0510034061011, 0510034061012, 0510034061013, 0510034061014, 0510034061015, 0510034061016, 0510034061017, 0510034061018, 0510034061019, 0510034061020, 0510034061021, 0510034061022, 0510034061023, 0510034061024, 0510034061025, 0510034061026, 0510034061027, 0510034061028, 0510034061029, 0510034061030, 0510034061031, 0510034061032, 0510034061033, 0510034061034, 0510034061035, 0510034061036, 0510034061037, 0510034061038, 0510034061039, 0510034061040, 0510034061041, 0510034061042, 0510034061043, 0510034061044, 0510034061045, 0510034061046, 0510034061047, 0510034061048, 0510034061049, 0510034061050, 0510034061051, 0510034061052, 0510034061053, 0510034061054, 0510034061055, 0510034061056, 0510034061057, 0510034061058, 0510034061059, 0510034061060, 0510034061061, 0510034061062, 0510034061063, 0510034061064, 0510034061065, 0510034061066, 0510034061067, 0510034061068, 0510034061069, 0510034061070, 0510034061071, 0510034061072, 0510034061073, 0510034061074, 0510034061075, 0510034061076, 0510034061077, 0510034061078, 0510034061079, 0510034061080, 0510034061081, 0510034061082, 0510034061083, 0510034061084, 0510034061085, 0510034061086, 0510034061087, 0510034061088, 0510034061089, 0510034061090, 0510034061091, 0510034061092, 0510034061093, 0510034061094, 0510034061095, 0510034061096, 0510034061097, 0510034061098, 0510034061099, 0510034061100, 0510034061101, 0510034061102, 0510034061103, 0510034061104, 0510034061105, 0510034061106, 0510034061107, 0510034061108, 0510034061109, 0510034071000, 0510034071001, 0510034071002, 0510034071003, 0510034071004, 0510034071005, 0510034071006, 0510034071007, 0510034071008, 0510034071009, 0510034071010, 0510034071011, 0510034071012, 0510034071013, 0510034071014, 0510034071015, 0510034071016, 0510034071017, 0510034071018, 0510034072000, 0510034072001, 0510034072002, 0510034072003, 0510034072004, 0510034072005, 0510034072006, 0510034072007, 0510034072008, 0510034072009, 0510034072010, 0510034072011, 0510034081000, 0510034081001, 0510034081002, 0510034081003, 0510034081004, 0510034081005, 0510034081006, 0510034081007, 0510034081008, 0510034081009, 0510034081010, 0510034081011, 0510034081012, 0510034081013, 0510034081014, 0510034081015, 0510034081016, 0510034081017, 0510034081018, 0510034081019, 0510034081020, 0510034081021, 0510034081022, 0510034081023, 0510034081024, 0510034081025, 0510034081026, 0510034081027, 0510034081028, 0510034081029, 0510034081030, 0510034081031, 0510034081032, 0510034081033, 0510034081034, 0510034081035, 0510034081036, 0510034081037, 0510034081038, 0510034081039, 0510034081040, 0510034081041, 0510034081042, 0510034081043, 0510034081044, 0510034081045, 0510034081046, 0510034082000, 0510034082001, 0510034082002, 0510034082003, 0510034082004, 0510034082005, 0510034082006, 0510034082007, 0510034082008, 0510034082009, 0510034082010, 0510034082011, 0510034082012, 0510034082013, 0510034082014, 0510034082015, 0510034082016, 0510034082017, 0510034082018, 0510034082019, 0510034082020, 0510034082021, 0510034082022, 0510034082023, 0510034082024, 0510034082025, 0510034082026, 0510034082027, 0510034082028, 0510034082029, 0510034082030, 0510034082031, 0510034082032, 0510034082033, 0510034082034, 0510034082035, 0510034082036, 0510034082037, 0510034082038, 0510034082039, 0510034082040, 0510034082041, 0510034082042, 0510034082043, 0510034082044, 0510034082045, 0510034082046, 0510034082047, 0510034082048, 0510034082049, 0510034082050, 0510034082051, 0510034082052, 0510034082053, 0510034082054, 0510034082055, 0510034082056, 0510034082057, 0510034082058, 0510034082059, 0510034082060, 0510034082061, 0510034082062, 0510034082063, 0510034082064, 0510034082065, 0510034082066, 0510034082067, 0510034082068, 0510034082069, 0510034082070, 0510034082071, 0510034082072, 0510034082073, 0510034082074, 0510035001000, 0510035001001, 0510035001002, 0510035001003, 0510035001004, 0510035001005, 0510035001006, 0510035001007, 0510035001008, 0510035001009, 0510035001010, 0510035001011, 0510035001012, 0510035001013, 0510035001014, 0510035001015, 0510035001016, 0510035001017, 0510035001018, 0510035001019, 0510035001020, 0510035001021, 0510035001022, 0510035001023, 0510035001024, 0510035001025, 0510035001026, 0510035001027, 0510035001028, 0510035001029, 0510035001030, 0510035002000, 0510035002001, 0510035002002, 0510035002003, 0510035002004, 0510035002005, 0510035002006, 0510035002007, 0510035002008, 0510035002009, 0510035002010, 0510035002011, 0510035002012, 0510035002013, 0510035002014, 0510035002015, 0510035002016, 0510035002017, 0510035002018, 0510035002019, 0510035002020, 0510035002021, 0510035002022, 0510035002023, 0510035002024, 0510035002025, 0510035002026, 0510035002027, 0510035002028, 0510035002029, 0510035003000, 0510035003001, 0510035003002, 0510035003003, 0510035003004, 0510035003005, 0510035003006, 0510035003007, 0510035003008, 0510035003009, 0510035003010, 0510035003011, 0510035003012, 0510035003013, 0510035003014, 0510035003015, 0510035003016, 0510035003017, 0510035003018, 0510035003019, 0510035003020, 0510035003021, 0510035003022, 0510035003023, 0510035003024, 0510035003025, 0510035003026, 0510035003027, 0510035003028, 0510035003029, 0510035003030, 0510035003031, 0510035003032, 0510035003033, 0510035003034, 0510035003035, 0510035003036, 0510035003037, 0510035004000, 0510035004001, 0510035004002, 0510035004003, 0510035004004, 0510035004005, 0510035004006, 0510035004007, 0510035004008, 0510035004009, 0510035004010, 0510035004011, 0510035004012, 0510035004013, 0510035004014, 0510035004015, 0510035004016, 0510035004017, 0510035004018, 0510035004019, 0510035004020, 0510035004021, 0510035004022, 0510035004023, 0510035004024, 0510035004025, 0510035004026, 0510035004027, 0510035004028, 0510035004029, 0510036001011, 0510036001018, 0510036001020, 0510036001023, 0510036001024, 0510036001025, 0510036001026, 0510036001027, 0510036001028, 0510036001029, 0510036001030, 0510036001031, 0510036001032, 0510036001033, 0510036001034, 0510036001035, 0510036001036, 0510036001037, 0510036001038, 0510036001043, 0510036001044, 0510036001045, 0510036001046, 0510036001047, 0510036001048, 0510036001049, 0510036001050, 0510036001051, 0510036001052, 0510036001053, 0510036001054, 0510036001055, 0510036001056, 0510036001057, 0510036001058, 0510036001059, 0510036001060, 0510036002000, 0510036002001, 0510036002002, 0510036002003, 0510036002004, 0510036002005, 0510036002006, 0510036002007, 0510036002008, 0510036002009, 0510036002010, 0510036002011, 0510036002012, 0510036003013, 0510036003034, 0510036003036, 0510036004002, 0510036004003, 0510036004004, 0510036004005, 0510036004006, 0510036004007, 0510036004008, 0510036004009, 0510036004010, 0510036004011, 0510036004012, 0510036004013, 0510036004014, 0510036004015, 0510036004016, 0510036004017, 0510036004018, 0510036004019, 0510036004020, 0510036004021, 0510036004022, 0510036004023, 0510036004024, 0510036004025, 0510036004026, 0510036004027, 0510036004028, 0510036004029, 0510036004030, 0510036004031, 0510036004032, 0510036004033, 0510036004034, 0510036004035, 0510036004036, 0510036004037, 0510036004038, 0510036004039, 0510036004040, 0510036004041, 0510036004042, 0510036004043, 0510036004044, 0510036004045, 0510036004046, 0510036004047, 510036004049, 0510036004050, 0510036004051, 0510036004052, 0510036004053, 0510036004054, 0510036004055, 0510036004056, 0510036004057, 0510036004058, 0510036004059, 0510037001003, 0510037001023, 0510037001024, 0519801001005, 0519801001006, 0519801001009, 0519801001017, 0519801001018, 0519801001019, 0519801001020, 0519801001021, 0519801001022, 0519801001023, 0519801001024, 0519801001025, 0519801001026, 0519801001027, 0519801001028, 0519801001029, 0519801001030, 0519801001031, 0519801001032, 0519801001033, 0519801001034, 0519801001035, 0519801001036, 0519801001037, 0519801001038, 0519801001039, 0519801001040, 0519801001041, 0519801001042, 0519801001043, 0519801001044, 0519801001045, 0519801001046, 0519801001047, 0519801001048, 0519801001049, 0519801001051, 0519801001052, 0519801001053, 0519801001054, 0519801001055, 0519801001056, 0519801001057, 0519801001058, 0519801001059, 0519801001060, 0519801001061, 0519801001062, 0519801001063, 0519801001064, 0519801001065, 0519801001066, 0519801001067, 0519801001068, 0519802001000, 0519802001001, 0519802001002, 0519802001003, 0519802001004, 0519802001005, 0519802001006, 0519802001007, 0519802001008, 0519802001009, 0519802001010, 0519802001011, 0519802001012, 0519802001013, 0519802001014, 0519802001015, 0519802001016, 0519802001017, 0519802001018, 0519802001019, 0519802001020, 0519802001021, 0519802001022, 0519802001023, 0519802001024, 0519802001025, 0519802001026, 0519802001028, 0519802001029, 0519802001030, 0519802001031, 0519802001032, 0519802001033, 0519802001034, 0519802001035, 0519802001036, 0519802001037, 0519802001038, 0519802001039, 0519802001040, 0519802001041, 0519802001042, 0519802001043, 0519802001044, 0519802001045; VTD: G2: 0510012001000, 0510012001001, 0510012001002, 0510012001003, 0510012001004, 0510012001005, 0510012001006, 0510012001007, 0510012001008, 0510012001009, 0510012001010, 0510024022002, 0510024022003, 0510024022005, 0510024022006, 0510024023000, 0510024023001, 0510024023002, 0510024023003, 0510024023004, 0510024023005, 0510024023006, 0510024023007, 0510024023008, 0510024023009, 0510024023011, 0510024023012, 0510024023013, 0510025013009, 0510025013010, 0510025013011, 0510025013012, 0510025013013, 0510025013018, 0510025013019, 0510025013021, 0510025013022, 0510025013024, 0510025013025, 0510025013026, 0510025013027, 0510025013028, 0510025013029, 0510025013030, 0510025013032, 0510025013034, 0510025013035, 0510025013036, 0510025013041, 0510025013042, 0510025013043, 0510025013044, 0510025013045, 0510025013046, 0510025013047, 0510025013048, 0510025013049, 0510025013050, 0510025013051, 0510025013052, 0510025013063, 0510025013064, 0510025013065, 0510025013068, 0510025013071, 0510025013072, 0510025013073, 0510025013074, 0510025013075, 0510025013076; VTD: LR63, VTD: MB62: Block(s) 0510033071009, 0510033071010, 0510033072000, 0510033072001, 0510033072002, 0510033072003, 0510033072004, 0510033072005, 0510033072006, 0510033072007, 0510033072008, 0510033072029, 0510033141000, 0510033141001, 0510033141002, 0510033141003, 0510033141004, 0510033141005, 0510033141006, 0510033141007, 0510033141008, 0510033141009, 0510033141010, 0510033141011, 0510033141012, 0510033141013, 0510033141014, 0510033141015, 0510033141016, 0510033141017, 0510033141018, 0510033141019, 0510033141020, 0510033141021, 0510033141022, 0510033141023, 0510033141024, 0510033141025, 0510033143000, 0510033143001, 0510033143002, 0510033143003, 0510033143009, 0510033143010, 0510033143011, 0510033143012, 0510033143013, 0510033143014. It has one judge. 0510034081000, 0510034081001, 0510034081002, 0510034081003, 0510034081004, 0510034081005, 0510034081006, 0510034081007, 0510034081008, 0510034081009, 0510034081010, 0510034081011, 0510034081012, 0510034081013, 0510034081014, 0510034081015, 0510034081016, 0510034081017, 0510034081018, 0510034081019, 0510034081020, 0510034081021, 0510034081022, 0510034081023, 0510034081024, 0510034081025, 0510034081026, 0510034081027, 0510034081028, 0510034081029, 0510034081030, 0510034081031, 0510034081032, 0510034081033, 0510034081034, 0510034081035, 0510034081036, 0510034081037, 0510034081038, 0510034081039, 0510034081040, 0510034081041, 0510034081042, 0510034081043, 0510034081044, 0510034081045, 0510034081046, 0510034082000, 0510034082001, 0510034082002, 0510034082003, 0510034082004, 0510034082005, 0510034082006, 0510034082007, 0510034082008, 0510034082009, 0510034082010, 0510034082011, 0510034082012, 0510034082013, 0510034082014, 0510034082015, 0510034082016, 0510034082017, 0510034082018, 0510034082019, 0510034082020, 0510034082021, 0510034082022, 0510034082023, 0510034082024, 0510034082025, 0510034082026, 0510034082027, 0510034082028, 0510034082029, 0510034082030, 0510034082031, 0510034082032, 0510034082033, 0510034082034, 0510034082035, 0510034082036, 0510034082037, 0510034082038, 0510034082039, 0510034082040, 0510034082041, 0510034082042, 0510034082043, 0510034082044, 0510034082045, 0510034082046, 0510034082047, 0510034082048, 0510034082049, 0510034082050, 0510034082051, 0510034082052, 0510034082053, 0510034082054, 0510034082055, 0510034082056, 0510034082057, 0510034082058, 0510034082059, 0510034082060, 0510034082061, 0510034082062, 0510034082063, 0510034082064, 0510034082065, 0510034082066, 0510034082067, 0510034082068, 0510034082069, 0510034082070, 0510034082071, 0510034082072, 0510034082073, 0510034082074, 0510035001000, 0510035001001, 0510035001002, 0510035001003, 0510035001004, 0510035001005, 0510035001006, 0510035001007, 0510035001008, 0510035001009, 0510035001010, 0510035001011, 0510035001012, 0510035001013, 0510035001014, 0510035001015, 0510035001016, 0510035001017, 0510035001018, 0510035001019, 0510035001020, 0510035001021, 0510035001022, 0510035001023, 0510035001024, 0510035001025, 0510035001026, 0510035001027, 0510035001028, 0510035001029, 0510035001030, 0510035002000, 0510035002001, 0510035002002, 0510035002003, 0510035002004, 0510035002005, 0510035002006, 0510035002007, 0510035002008, 0510035002009, 0510035002010, 0510035002011, 0510035002012, 0510035002013, 0510035002014, 0510035002015, 0510035002016, 0510035002017, 0510035002018, 0510035002019, 0510035002020, 0510035002021, 0510035002022, 0510035002023, 0510035002024, 0510035002025, 0510035002026, 0510035002027, 0510035002028, 0510035002029, 0510035003000, 0510035003001, 0510035003002, 0510035003003, 0510035003004, 0510035003005, 0510035003006, 0510035003007, 0510035003008, 0510035003009, 0510035003010, 0510035003011, 0510035003012, 0510035003013, 0510035003014, 0510035003015, 0510035003016, 0510035003017, 0510035003018, 0510035003019, 0510035003020, 0510035003021, 0510035003022, 0510035003023, 0510035003024, 0510035003025, 0510035003026, 0510035003027, 0510035003028, 0510035003029, 0510035003030, 0510035003031, 0510035003032, 0510035003033, 0510035003034, 0510035003035, 0510035003036, 0510035003037, 0510035004000, 0510035004001, 0510035004002, 0510035004003, 0510035004004, 0510035004005, 0510035004006, 0510035004007, 0510035004008, 0510035004009, 0510035004010, 0510035004011, 0510035004012, 0510035004013, 0510035004014, 0510035004015, 0510035004016, 0510035004017, 0510035004018, 0510035004019, 0510035004020, 0510035004021, 0510035004022, 0510035004023, 0510035004024, 0510035004025, 0510035004026, 0510035004027, 0510035004028, 0510035004029, 0510036001011, 0510036001018, 0510036001020, 0510036001023, 0510036001024, 0510036001025, 0510036001026, 0510036001027, 0510036001028, 0510036001029, 0510036001030, 0510036001031, 0510036001032, 0510036001033, 0510036001034, 0510036001035, 0510036001036, 0510036001037, 0510036001038, 0510036001043, 0510036001044, 0510036001045, 0510036001046, 0510036001047, 0510036001048, 0510036001049, 0510036001050, 0510036001051, 0510036001052, 0510036001053, 0510036001054, 0510036001055, 0510036001056, 0510036001057, 0510036001058, 0510036001059, 0510036001060, 0510036002000, 0510036002001, 0510036002002, 0510036002003, 0510036002004, 0510036002005, 0510036002006, 0510036002007, 0510036002008, 0510036002009, 0510036002010, 0510036002011, 0510036002012, 0510036003013, 0510036003034, 0510036003036, 0510036004002, 0510036004003, 0510036004004, 0510036004005, 0510036004006, 0510036004007, 0510036004008, 0510036004009, 0510036004010, 0510036004011, 0510036004012, 0510036004013, 0510036004014, 0510036004015, 0510036004016, 0510036004017, 0510036004018, 0510036004019, 0510036004020, 0510036004021, 0510036004022, 0510036004023, 0510036004024, 0510036004025, 0510036004026, 0510036004027, 0510036004028, 0510036004029, 0510036004030, 0510036004031, 0510036004032, 0510036004033, 0510036004034, 0510036004035, 0510036004036, 0510036004037, 0510036004038, 0510036004039, 0510036004040, 0510036004041, 0510036004042, 0510036004043, 0510036004044, 0510036004045, 0510036004046, 0510036004047, 510036004049, 0510036004050, 0510036004051, 0510036004052, 0510036004053, 0510036004054, 0510036004055, 0510036004056, 0510036004057, 0510036004058, 0510036004059, 0510037001003, 0510037001023, 0510037001024, 0519801001005, 0519801001006, 0519801001009, 0519801001017, 0519801001018, 0519801001019, 0519801001020, 0519801001021, 0519801001022, 0519801001023, 0519801001024, 0519801001025, 0519801001026, 0519801001027, 0519801001028, 0519801001029, 0519801001030, 0519801001031, 0519801001032, 0519801001033, 0519801001034, 0519801001035, 0519801001036, 0519801001037, 0519801001038, 0519801001039, 0519801001040, 0519801001041, 0519801001042, 0519801001043, 0519801001044, 0519801001045, 0519801001046, 0519801001047, 0519801001048, 0519801001049, 0519801001051, 0519801001052, 0519801001053, 0519801001054, 0519801001055, 0519801001056, 0519801001057, 0519801001058, 0519801001059, 0519801001060, 0519801001061, 0519801001062, 0519801001063, 0519801001064, 0519801001065, 0519801001066, 0519801001067, 0519801001068, 0519802001000, 0519802001001, 0519802001002, 0519802001003, 0519802001004, 0519802001005, 0519802001006, 0519802001007, 0519802001008, 0519802001009, 0519802001010, 0519802001011, 0519802001012, 0519802001013, 0519802001014, 0519802001015, 0519802001016, 0519802001017, 0519802001018, 0519802001019, 0519802001020, 0519802001021, 0519802001022, 0519802001023, 0519802001024, 0519802001025, 0519802001026, 0519802001028, 0519802001029, 0519802001030, 0519802001031, 0519802001032, 0519802001033, 0519802001034, 0519802001035, 0519802001036, 0519802001037, 0519802001038, 0519802001039, 0519802001040, 0519802001041, 0519802001042, 0519802001043, 0519802001044, 0519802001045; VTD: G2: 0510012001000, 0510012001001, 0510012001002, 0510012001003, 0510012001004, 0510012001005, 0510012001006, 0510012001007, 0510012001008, 0510012001009, 0510012001010, 0510024022002, 0510024022003, 0510024022005, 0510024022006, 0510024023000, 0510024023001, 0510024023002, 0510024023003, 0510024023004, 0510024023005, 0510024023006, 0510024023007, 0510024023008, 0510024023009, 0510024023011, 0510024023012, 0510024023013, 0510025013009, 0510025013010, 0510025013011, 0510025013012, 0510025013013, 0510025013018, 0510025013019, 0510025013021, 0510025013022, 0510025013024, 0510025013025, 0510025013026, 0510025013027, 0510025013028, 0510025013029, 0510025013030, 0510025013032, 0510025013034, 0510025013035, 0510025013036, 0510025013041, 0510025013042, 0510025013043, 0510025013044, 0510025013045, 0510025013046, 0510025013047, 0510025013048, 0510025013049, 0510025013050, 0510025013051, 0510025013052, 0510025013063, 0510025013064, 0510025013065, 0510025013068, 0510025013071, 0510025013072, 0510025013073, 0510025013074, 0510025013075, 0510025013076; VTD: LR63, VTD: MB62: Block(s) 0510033071009, 0510033071010, 0510033072000, 0510033072001, 0510033072002, 0510033072003, 0510033072004, 0510033072005, 0510033072006, 0510033072007, 0510033072008, 0510033072029, 0510033141000, 0510033141001, 0510033141002, 0510033141003, 0510033141004, 0510033141005, 0510033141006, 0510033141007, 0510033141008, 0510033141009, 0510033141010, 0510033141011, 0510033141012, 0510033141013, 0510033141014, 0510033141015, 0510033141016, 0510033141017, 0510033141018, 0510033141019, 0510033141020, 0510033141021, 0510033141022, 0510033141023, 0510033141024, 0510033141025, 0510033143000, 0510033143001, 0510033143002, 0510033143003, 0510033143009, 0510033143010, 0510033143011, 0510033143012, 0510033143013, 0510033143014. It has one judge. VTD: G2: 0510012001000, 0510012001001, 0510012001002, 0510012001003, 0510012001004, 0510012001005, 0510012001006, 0510012001007, 0510012001008, 0510012001009, 0510012001010, 0510024022002, 0510024022003, 0510024022005, 0510024022006, 0510024023000, 0510024023001, 0510024023002, 0510024023003, 0510024023004, 0510024023005, 0510024023006, 0510024023007, 0510024023008, 0510024023009, 0510024023011, 0510024023012, 0510024023013, 0510025013009, 0510025013010, 0510025013011, 0510025013012, 0510025013013, 0510025013018, 0510025013019, 0510025013021, 0510025013022, 0510025013024, 0510025013025, 0510025013026, 0510025013027, 0510025013028, 0510025013029, 0510025013030, 0510025013032, 0510025013034, 0510025013035, 0510025013036, 0510025013041, 0510025013042, 0510025013043, 0510025013044, 0510025013045, 0510025013046, 0510025013047, 0510025013048, 0510025013049, 0510025013050, 0510025013051, 0510025013052, 0510025013063, 0510025013064, 0510025013065, 0510025013068, 0510025013071, 0510025013072, 0510025013073, 0510025013074, 0510025013075, 0510025013076; VTD: LR63, VTD: MB62: Block(s) 0510033071009, 0510033071010, 0510033072000, 0510033072001, 0510033072002, 0510033072003, 0510033072004, 0510033072005, 0510033072006, 0510033072007, 0510033072008, 0510033072029, 0510033141000, 0510033141001, 0510033141002, 0510033141003, 0510033141004, 0510033141005, 0510033141006, 0510033141007, 0510033141008, 0510033141009, 0510033141010, 0510033141011, 0510033141012, 0510033141013, 0510033141014, 0510033141015, 0510033141016, 0510033141017, 0510033141018, 0510033141019, 0510033141020, 0510033141021, 0510033141022, 0510033141023, 0510033141024, 0510033141025, 0510033143000, 0510033143001, 0510033143002, 0510033143003, 0510033143009, 0510033143010, 0510033143011, 0510033143012, 0510033143013, 0510033143014. It has one judge.
